src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
!  --------------------
!! The Ter Sami language adjectives compare.

LEXICON adj

+A: A1 ;

LEXICON A1
+Attr:%>0 #;
+Pred+Sg:%>0 #;

!LEXICON Comparisons
!+A+cmp:er       Cases   ;
!+A+sup:est      Cases   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
