src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjectives
!  ----------
!! Adjectives in the Ter Sami language describe things.

LEXICON Adjectives

шуурр      adj "groß / большой" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:


!! Adverbs
!  ----------
!! Adverbs in the Ter Sami language describe things.

LEXICON adv   !!= * __@CODE@__ adds the tag +Adv
+Adv: # ;

LEXICON Adverbs

ӣнцэ adv ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
